Tennessee, session 114, HB0940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-9-505, is amended by deleting the
language "twelve (12)" and substituting "sixteen (16)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 69, Chapter 9, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
It is unlawful for any person to own, operate, or to allow another person to
operate a personal watercraft upon the waters of Tennessee unless such person is able
to furnish proof of financial responsibility for the operation of the personal watercraft in
the amounts specified in § 55-12-102(12)(D)(i).
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare
requiring it. Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0940
002890
- 1 -